District of Columbia statutes.
16-2801

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Healthcare provider” means an individual or entity licensed or otherwise authorized under District law to provide healthcare service, including a hospital, nursing facility, comprehensive outpatient rehabilitation facility, home health agency, hospice program, renal dialysis facility, ambulatory surgical center, pharmacy, physician or health care practitioner’s office, long-term care facility, behavior health residential treatment facility, health clinic, birth center, clinical laboratory, health center, physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, certified registered nurse anesthetist, certified nurse midwife, psychologist, certified social worker, registered dietitian or nutrition professional, physical or occupational therapist, pharmacist, or other individual health care practitioner.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807